District of Columbia statutes.
1-617.18

Evaluation process for public school employees.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule, or regulation, during fiscal year 2006 and each succeeding fiscal year the evaluation process and instruments for evaluating District of Columbia Public Schools employees shall be a non-negotiable item for collective bargaining purposes.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1718
as added Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2039, Pub. L. 109-356, § 302

Cross References

Mayor and Council members, coverage, see § 1-602.02.
Merit system, coverage and limitations of Chapter 6 of Title 1, see § 1-602.02.
Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-618.18.

Editor's Notes

Pub. L. 104-134, § 143, Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 214, provided as follows:

“§ 1-617.18. Public school employee evaluations.”

“Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule, or regulation, the evaluation process and instruments for evaluating District of Columbia Public Schools employees shall be a nonnegotiable item for collective bargaining purposes.”